District of Columbia statutes.
1-617.16

Collective bargaining concerning compensation.

(a)

The Board shall provide for collective bargaining concerning compensation under the procedures of and on the dates provided in § 1-617.17. The Mayor, the Attorney General for employees of the Office of the Attorney General, the District of Columbia Board of Education for its educational employees, and the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia for its educational employees shall negotiate agreements regarding noncompensation issues at the same time as compensation issues.

(b)

The provisions of this section shall become effective on January 1, 1980, and shall apply to all employees, including employees described in § 1-602.04, of a particular occupational group who are represented by a labor organization which has been granted exclusive recognition under this chapter by the Board. The determination of an appropriate unit for the purpose of negotiations concerning compensation shall not require a request from a labor organization. In determining appropriate bargaining units for negotiations concerning compensation, the Board shall authorize broad units of occupational groups so as to minimize the number of different pay systems or schemes. The Board may authorize bargaining by multiple employer or employee groups as may be appropriate.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1716, 25 DCR 5740
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 3(w), 33 DCR 7241
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 302(v), 43 DCR 2978
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1033(g), 62 DCR 10905
Retirement of public school teachers, compensation and salaries, purchase of annuity contracts, see § 38-2023.16.
Retirement of public school teachers, “eligible service” defined, see § 38-2021.13.
This section is referenced in § 1-602.06, § 1-617.08, § 1-617.17, § 1-636.02, § 38-2021.13, and § 38-2023.16.
1981 Ed., § 1-618.16.
1973 Ed., § 1-347.16.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 added “the Attorney General for employees of the Office of the Attorney General” in (a).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1033(g) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Repeal of § 3 of Law 6-177: Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 provided that the provisions of § 3 are repealed on the 1st day following the 36-month period after February 24, 1987.

Repeal of § 4(b) of Law 6-177: Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 8-74, effective March 15, 1990, provided that § 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 is repealed.